District of Columbia statutes.
50-1804

Application of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to drivers operating a motor vehicle in the District of Columbia and their passengers.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-73, § 5, 32 DCR 6344
1981 Ed., § 40-1604.

Expiration of Law 6-73

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1801.